lib/dict/lv_LV.aff
SFX %   çrt   eramâs     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   erami      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramie     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramiem    [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramo      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramos     [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramu      [ç]rt
SFX %   çrt   eramus     [ç]rt

SFX e Y 25
SFX e   t   is      t
SFX e   t   uða     t
SFX e   t   uðam    t
SFX e   t   uðu     t
SFX e   t   uðâ     t
SFX e   t   usi     t
SFX e   t   uðas    t
SFX e   t   uðai    t
SFX e   t   uði     t
SFX e   t   uðiem   t
SFX e   t   uðus    t
SFX e   t   uðos    t
SFX e   t   uðâm    t
SFX e   t   uðâs    t
SFX e   t   uðais   t
SFX e   t   uðajam  t
SFX e   t   uðo     t
SFX e   t   uðajâ   t
SFX e   t   usî     t
SFX e   t   uðajai  t
SFX e   t   uðie    t
SFX e   t   uðajiem t
SFX e   t   uðajos  t
SFX e   t   uðajâm  t
SFX e   t   uðajâs  t

SFX 9 Y 177
SFX 9   t   is      [^gîklû]t
SFX 9   t   uða     [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðam    [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðu     [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðâ     [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   usi     [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðas    [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðai    [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uði     [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðiem   [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðus    [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðos    [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðâm    [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðâs    [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðais   [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðajam  [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðo     [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðajâ   [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   usî     [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðajai  [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðie    [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðajiem [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðajos  [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðajâm  [^lûî]t
SFX 9   t   uðajâs  [^lûî]t
SFX 9   kt  cis     [k]t
SFX 9   gt  dzis    [g]t
SFX 9   ût   uvis      [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuða     [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðam    [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðu     [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðâ     [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvusi     [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðas    [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðai    [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuði     [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðiem   [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðus    [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðos    [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðâm    [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðâs    [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðais   [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðajam  [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðo     [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðajâ   [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvusî     [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðajai  [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðie    [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðajiem [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðajos  [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðajâm  [û]t
SFX 9   ût   uvuðajâs  [û]t
SFX 9   ît   inis      [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuða     [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðam    [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðu     [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðâ     [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inusi     [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðas    [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðai    [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuði     [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðiem   [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðus    [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðos    [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðâm    [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðâs    [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðais   [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðajam  [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðo     [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðajâ   [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inusî     [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðajai  [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðie    [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðajiem [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðajos  [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðajâm  [î]t
SFX 9   ît   inuðajâs  [î]t
SFX 9   t   is      [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uða     [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðam    [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðu     [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðâ     [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   usi     [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðas    [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðai    [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uði     [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðiem   [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðus    [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðos    [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðâm    [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðâs    [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðais   [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðajam  [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðo     [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðajâ   [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   usî     [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðajai  [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðie    [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðajiem [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðajos  [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðajâm  [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   t   uðajâs  [^eiu]lt
SFX 9   elt   çlis      [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluða     [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðam    [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðu     [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðâ     [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çlusi     [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðas    [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðai    [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluði     [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðiem   [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðus    [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðos    [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðâm    [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðâs    [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðais   [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðajam  [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðo     [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðajâ   [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çlusî     [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðajai  [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðie    [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðajiem [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðajos  [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðajâm  [e]lt
SFX 9   elt   çluðajâs  [e]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îlis      [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluða     [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðam    [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðu     [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðâ     [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îlusi     [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðas    [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðai    [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluði     [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðiem   [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðus    [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðos    [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðâm    [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðâs    [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðais   [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðajam  [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðo     [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðajâ   [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îlusî     [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðajai  [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðie    [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðajiem [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðajos  [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðajâm  [i]lt
SFX 9   ilt   îluðajâs  [i]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûlis      [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluða     [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðam    [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðu     [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðâ     [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûlusi     [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðas    [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðai    [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluði     [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðiem   [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðus    [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðos    [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðâm    [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðâs    [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðais   [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðajam  [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðo     [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðajâ   [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûlusî     [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðajai  [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðie    [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðajiem [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðajos  [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðajâm  [u]lt
SFX 9   ult   ûluðajâs  [u]lt

SFX b  Y 50
SFX b   t   jis      [^s]t
SFX b   t   juða     [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðam    [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðu     [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðâ     [^s]t
SFX b   t   jusi     [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðas    [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðai    [^s]t
SFX b   t   juði     [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðiem   [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðus    [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðos    [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðâm    [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðâs    [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðais   [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðajam  [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðo     [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðajâ   [^s]t
SFX b   t   jusî     [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðajai  [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðie    [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðajiem [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðajos  [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðajâm  [^s]t
SFX b   t   juðajâs  [^s]t
SFX b   st   dis      [s]t
SFX b   st   duða     [s]t
SFX b   st   duðam    [s]t
SFX b   st   duðu     [s]t
SFX b   st   duðâ     [s]t
SFX b   st   dusi     [s]t
SFX b   st   duðas    [s]t
SFX b   st   duðai    [s]t
SFX b   st   duði     [s]t
SFX b   st   duðiem   [s]t
SFX b   st   duðus    [s]t
SFX b   st   duðos    [s]t
SFX b   st   duðâm    [s]t
SFX b   st   duðâs    [s]t
SFX b   st   duðais   [s]t
SFX b   st   duðajam  [s]t
SFX b   st   duðo     [s]t
SFX b   st   duðajâ   [s]t
SFX b   st   dusî     [s]t
SFX b   st   duðajai  [s]t
SFX b   st   duðie    [s]t
SFX b   st   duðajiem [s]t
SFX b   st   duðajos  [s]t
SFX b   st   duðajâm  [s]t
SFX b   st   duðajâs  [s]t


SFX I Y 23
SFX I  t    ts      t
SFX I  t    ta      t
SFX I  t    tai     t
SFX I  t    tais    t
SFX I  t    tajai   t
SFX I  t    tajam   t
SFX I  t    tajiem  t
SFX I  t    tajos   t
SFX I  t    tajâ    t
SFX I  t    tajâm   t
SFX I  t    tajâs   t
SFX I  t    tam     t
SFX I  t    tas     t
SFX I  t    ti      t
SFX I  t    tie     t
SFX I  t    tiem    t
SFX I  t    to      t
SFX I  t    tos     t
SFX I  t    tus     t
SFX I  t    tâ      t
SFX I  t    tâm     t
SFX I  t    tâs     t
SFX I  t    tu      t
