lib/dict/lv_LV.dic
aizknâbt/e+I$)6B4
aizliegt/%+9IB56
aizlobt/)$eI+B64
aizmiegt/+%B69I5
aizplâksterçt/)+IH$bB1
aiztraukt/%I+6B59d][
aiztriekt/I[J69Bd%M5]
aiztriept/I+$)e6B4
aizvazât/+)dbI1gG$MBJH][p{
amalgamçt/+Bd$gIpb)JM]G[H1{
apdiegt/I9+B%65
apdûkt/+%69IB5
apelçt/+b$H)1IJBM
apgriezt/+e2dBI6T]4[
aplenkt/9+6BI%5
aplipt/+IeBJ][4M7
aplodât/+{bdBIg1]J)[$pMGH
apmîïot/+bd1gHI$)M{GB[J]p
applukt/9+B40
apskurbt/B7e+^JIMZ4
apslaukt/+9%I6B5
apspïaudît/1+(MIhbBJC
apstîpot/I$J]+)Mb{gHBdG1[p
apsîkt/+%I95B6
aptraukt/+6%BI59
apìçrbt/+BeI$)Td64][p
apğíelt/+96IB5
apğïûkt/+%96IB5
aromatizçt/+JHbIB$)1M
atbalsot/+I)$dB{GbHg[JM1]p
atbçgt/+(9IBhJ84M
atdziest/%+
atgremzt/B+2Ie64
atklîst/+7Ib%EJN
atknikğíinât/dB(cJ+bgI[1hC{M}]
atlipt/J+IB47e[M]
atlîkt/+J^9B7IZ4M
atmaksât/I+)J]Mbd$gGp1BH{[
atplîst/J+e%IM7F
atsaukt/+dIB%695][
atsirot/+$bIMH)JB1
atslaukt/+69IB%5
atstiept/6T+$)IedBp][4
atsûkt/+I%695B
attaurçt/+)MIB$bJH1
atvçzt/6+eBI4
atğòâkt/+%69BI5
augstdzimt/+e
birdinât/h(B+Ib1JCM
buèot/+[IdM1gG),b$B.Hp{J]
caurbraukt/I%B+965
drillçt/+IJ$b1BHM
dzelt/+6IB[9dMJ5]
dzirksteïot/+]JBdGbH$M[pgI)1{
dzçst/+IF3e]T
gâgât/gBI$+Gb{d)1[MpJH]
hipnotizçt/+bMI1BJH$
iebliezt/2eI+B64
iegârgt/+69I[dB%5]
iekalst/+4BJ7I%N
iekampt/MI$J6Be)4
iekasçt/+HbIB1J)$M
ieknakstît/+(Jb1IBhMC
ielîkt/^+9BZ4IMJ7
iemelst/F+I3e
ieplunkğíinât/+(hIbMJ1BC
ieplîst/%+JeI7MF
iesarkt/+IB49ZJ^M
iesirot/)I+b$HJB1M
ieskâbt/+^eZIMB7J4
iesvîtrot/+b&M*B)J$1IH
iesâkt/hJ+T]9(dI}B4M8[
iesût/+%0
ieèukstçt/(+BIbJhMC1
ieïimt/Ie+ZJ7B4^M
ieğmaukt/+B%I695
ikonizçt/b+$H)JI1BM
izbeigt/[I+9%Bd56]
izdegt/+hJ]M(TId[B49}8
izdrupt/+Be8M4IJ
izdvağot/b+)JI$HBM1
izfotografçt/+)Mb$BI1HJ
izklupt/e8+IJBM4
izkârt/%eJ]Bd6TI[M4
izlikt/+ITJ]94BMd7[
izlîkt/+^I7BZ9MJ4
izmaitât/+GM)IJb{$HgdB[1p]
iznest/+(hJe8MIFT}]
izrûkt/+9%6]I[dB5
izsaldçt/HJ+BIb1)$M
izsmaiïot/+J$I)bBH1M
izsteigt/+%Id9[5B6]
izsûkt/+9%6]IdB[5
iztapt/TeI+dBM47J][
izvarot/)I+bJ$HMB1
izèâpot/I+)BJ$1bMH
izğïukt/9JIB4+M
izşòaugt/9%JMI6B5
karbonçt/1HB)Mb$IJ+
knupt/eIB+M48J
koriìçt/)H+b$gpIdGB{J[1M]
lakot/+[BdI{$)gb1JMGHp]
lçst/+ITeF3]
modernizçt/+)$gGBJIdb[MH1{]p
mulst/7I+%FJeM
narkotizçt/G){$g+]J[bdIMBp1H
neaizplûkt/9B
neatlobt/$)eB
neizìçrbt/e)$d[pTB]
nenoşmiegt/d9B%[]
nepiekârt/%I4B6e
nesaşmiegt/%[d9B]
neuzsûkt/d[B]9
neuzìçrbt/)$eB
nodziedât/+Ibhdc1gM}]JB{[
nogavilçt/+IBMHGbg)$1d{[J]p
nogremzt/B+2TIe]d[46
nokaukt/+Bd9%I5[]6
nokrâpt/+e)$BI64
nolidinât/I+(BMhbCJ1
nolinèot/+IB$b1M)HJ
nomiegt/+%9I6B5
noplûst/%b+IEJ7N
noraudzçt/J+$IB1)bMH
norîkot/+$)IHb1BJM
nosusinât/+Ib(B1MhJC
noteikt/+96IB%d[]5
notempt/$e+)IB64
notrenkt/I+Bd9[%65]
notvaicçt/B+)IJHbM$1
noèubinât/+Bbh(JI1CM
objektorientçt/$B+bIJ)MH1
pabeigt/+%5BI96
pabçrt/+eI%6B4
pacept/de8T+}hB(IM4]J[
pagaist/I%+Fe4J7M
pajodelçt/b+J$IHB)1M
paklunkğíinât/+(BIbhMCJ1
pakûst/+%
panaglot/Ib)$+JBMH1
panest/FJMI+he(}8T]
panâkt/+hdB][9I}(85
paplakt/+79IJB4M
pasludinât/h+JIbBM(1C
paspindzçt/h+MIB1b(JC
pasteigt/+d9%I6B5][
pasûkt/+9%6IB5
pavçrpt/+)eIB6$4
pavçsmot/J+)B$bI1MH
pağïâkt/5B6%9I+
paòerkstçt/h+g(BbIcCdJM[1{}]
piecelt/d+695IB[]
piedrîvçt/$b+BMIHJ)1
piekarst/+%IeFJM
pieklupt/e+JB8IM4
piepuğíot/)JB+bI1$MH
pieredzçt/IB+(bJh1MC
pierçkt/9+I%65B
pierûkt/%+I96JBM5
piesalt/+e7BIZJ^M4
pieurgt/%+9IB65
piezagt/]+9JI7dB4[M
pieziest/b+E2I6
plukt/+9B04
proponçt/$BdG1gI+bJ[)pM{H]
pârbizot/+J)$bIMBH1
pârbliezt/I+2eB64
pârbraukt/I+%9B65
pârjûgt/B+%96I5
pârkutinât/c(b{J]+MgIh1BdC[}
pârlûst/+%J7
pârmâlçt/+Mb)$IHBJ1
pârpampt/7eM^Z+BI4J
pârskâbinât/+b(IMJ
pârsmelt/5+96BI
pârsçkt/%6+9IBd[5]
pârèîkstçt/+bIB(MJhC1
pârìçrbt/$d+eI)B64T[]p
pârğòâkt/+I95B%]d[6
riest/+2Fe3I]T
sabraucît/h(+b1IBJM
sahlorçt/BI+JHb)M$1
sakampt/B+$eIT6p)d4[]
sakliegt/%B6+[I9d]5
sakombinçt/+gdBJ]I$)bp[GM{H1
salakt/+[9IdBJT4M7]
sapîckât/+)JbIMB$H1
sarûkt/dB%9+MJ6h5I][
sasijât/+)bJGIBd$p{HgM[]1
saskurbt/IeB+Z7J4M^
saslçgt/+dB%9I]65[
sasûtît/I+1B(hbJMC
saukt/dIB%+95JM6[]
saîgt/+^IM9ZJB4
saşibulçt/+)I1B$MbJH
saşvadzinât/IbMc+ghJ(}B1[dC]{
slçpt/dBe[+I)T$p46]
spiegt/+J%I69MB5
stigt/+JBI7M94
uzaulekğot/+J$IH)bB1M
uzaust/+%eMJIF
uzdungot/Jb$)1IB+HM
uzgvelzt/MIBJ24e6
uzkviekt/+%6BI95
uzliekt/J9%5BIM6
uzriòíot/+I)$HbJBM1
uzsvelpt/)+I$e6B4
uztaisît/+BbhIJ(M1C
uztraukt/%+I9[Bd65]
vest/bEI[+J]N
vîst/J+%IB7N4
ğalkt/BI+%956MJ
òirbinât/b+([hdBg1c{CIJ}]M
òirbt/hT(+JeI4BdM8
